North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 1A. Legislative Retirement System.

§ 120-4.8.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases as used in this Article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:

“Accumulated contributions” means the sum of all the amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to his individual account in the annuity savings fund, together with regular interest as provided in G.S. 135-7(b).

“Actuarial equivalent” means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of the mortality tables as adopted by the Board of Trustees, and regular interest.

“Annuity” means payment for life derived from the “Accumulated contribution” of a member. All “annuities” are payable in equal monthly installments.

“Annuity reserve” means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any annuity or benefit in lieu of any annuity, computed upon the basis of the mortality tables as adopted by the Board of Trustees, and regular interest.

“Compensation” means salary and expense allowance paid for service as a legislator in the North Carolina General Assembly, exclusive of travel and per diem. Effective July 1, 2009, “compensation” also means payment of military differential wages.

“Filing,” when used in reference to an application for retirement, means the receipt of an acceptable application on a form provided by the Retirement System.

“Highest annual salary” means the twelve consecutive months of compensation authorized during a member’s final legislative term for the highest position that a member ever held as a member of the General Assembly.

“Medical Board” means the board of physicians provided for in

G.S. 135-6

, which shall determine disability as provided in this Article.

“Member in service” means a member in service on or after June 15, 1983.

“Pension reserve” means the present value of all payments to be made on account of any pension or benefit in lieu of any pension computed upon the basis of the mortality tables adopted by the Board of Trustees, and regular interest.

“Pensions” means payments for life derived from money provided by the State of North Carolina. All pensions are payable in equal monthly installments.

“Present member of the General Assembly” means a person who is a member of the General Assembly on or after June 15, 1983.

“Regular interest” means interest compounded annually at the rate determined by the Board of Trustees in accordance with G.S. 135-7(b) and

G.S. 120-4.10

.

“Retirement” means the withdrawal from active service with a retirement allowance granted under the provisions of this Article. In order for a member’s retirement to become effective in any month, the member must render no service at any time during that month.

“Year” as used in this Article shall mean the regular fiscal year beginning July 1, and ending June 30 in the following calendar year unless otherwise defined by rule of the Board of Trustees.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 198; 1987, c. 738, s. 31(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.29(a); 2009-66, s. 6(h).

§ 120-4.9.
Retirement system established.

A Retirement System is established and placed under the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System for administrative purposes. This Retirement System is a governmental plan, within the meaning of Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. Therefore, the nondiscrimination rules of Sections 401(a)(5) and 401(a)(26) of the Code do not apply.

The Retirement System shall have all the power and privileges of a corporation and shall be known as the “Legislative Retirement System of North Carolina.” By this name all of its business shall be transacted, all of its funds invested and all of its cash and securities and other property held. All direction and policies concerning the Legislative Retirement System shall be vested in the Board of Trustees.

Consistent with Section 401(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, all member employee and employer contributions to this Retirement System shall be made to funds held in trust through trust instruments that have the purposes of distributing trust principal and income to retired members and their beneficiaries and of paying other definitely determinable benefits under this Chapter, after meeting the necessary expenses of administering this Retirement System. Neither the trust corpus nor income from this trust can be used for purposes other than the exclusive benefit of members or their beneficiaries, except that employer contributions made to the trust under a good faith mistake of fact may be returned to an employer, where the refund can occur within less than one year after the mistaken contribution was made, consistent with the rule adopted by the Board of Trustees. The Retirement System shall have a consolidated Plan document, consisting of relevant statutory provisions in this Chapter, associated regulations in the North Carolina Administrative Code, substantive and procedural information on the official forms used by the Retirement System, and policies and minutes of the Board of Trustees.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 2012-130, s. 7(a); 2013-287, s. 6.

§ 120-4.10.
Administration of retirement system.

The Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System shall be the trustee of the Retirement System. The provisions of this Article shall be administered by the Board of Trustees.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 2013-287, s. 7.

§ 120-4.11.
Membership.

The following members of the General Assembly and former members of the General Assembly are eligible for membership in the Retirement System:

Members of the General Assembly who serve on and after June 15, 1983; and

Former members of the General Assembly who served prior to June 15, 1983; and

Who elect to transfer current and future entitlements, or contributions, from the Legislative Retirement Fund established by Chapter 1269 of the 1969 Session Laws; or

Who have five or more years of service as a member of the General Assembly.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 188, 189; 1985, c. 400, ss. 1, 7; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1109; 2001-424, s. 32.30(a).

§ 120-4.12.
Creditable service.

Creditable service at retirement consists of the membership service rendered by the member of the Retirement System and any prior service purchased or granted by this Article.

Membership Service means the number of years served as a member of the General Assembly as of the establishment of the Retirement System and thereafter. One year of membership service is equal to 12 months for which a legislator received compensation.

Prior service means:

The number of years a present member of the General Assembly served in the General Assembly prior to becoming a member of the Retirement System;

The number of years served by former members of the General Assembly who were vested in the Legislative Retirement Fund. One year of prior service is equal to 12 months for which a legislator received compensation.

(c1)

Any member of the Retirement System who was a member of the General Assembly as of January 1985 may purchase prior service credit for the month of January 1985 based upon seven percent (7%) of the compensation received for that period.

Any member of the Retirement System who has eight or more years of creditable service as a member of the General Assembly may purchase prior service credit for service in the Armed Forces of the United States at the same rates and conditions as set forth in

G.S. 120-4.14

and

G.S. 120-4.16

; provided that credit is allowed only for the initial period of active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States up to the time the member was first eligible to be separated or released therefrom, and subsequent periods of such active duty as required by the Armed Forces of the United States up to the date of first eligibility for separation or release therefrom; and further provided that the member submits satisfactory evidence of the service claimed and that service credit be allowed only for the period of active service in the Armed Forces of the United States not creditable in any other retirement system, except the National Guard or any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States.

Any member of the Retirement System who has five or more years of creditable service as a member of the General Assembly may purchase credit for service in the Armed Forces of the United States eligible under subsection (d) of this section by making a lump sum payment into the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full actuarial cost as provided for in

G.S. 135-4(m)

.

If a member who has not vested in this System on July 1, 2007, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 120-4.33

for acts committed after July 1, 2007, then that member shall forfeit all benefits under this System. If a member who has vested in this System on July 1, 2007, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 120-4.33

for acts committed after July 1, 2007, then that member is not entitled to any creditable service that accrued after July 1, 2007, regardless of whether that creditable service was earned by virtue of membership in the System, accrued by conversion of sick leave at the point of the member’s retirement, accrued by transfer of service from another retirement system, purchased by the member in accordance with this Article, or accrued by any other means. No member shall forfeit any benefit or creditable service earned from a position not as a member of the General Assembly. For purposes of this subsection, creditable service attributable to the conversion of sick leave accrues in this System on the date of retirement, service transferred to this System from another system accrues in this System on the effective date of the transfer, and purchased service accrues in this System on the date of the purchase.

If a member who is a present member of the General Assembly and who has not vested in this System on December 1, 2012, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 120-4.33

A for acts committed after December 1, 2012, then that member shall forfeit all benefits under this System, except for a return of member contributions plus interest. If a member who is a present member of the General Assembly and has vested in this System on December 1, 2012, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 120-4.33

A for acts committed after December 1, 2012, then that member is not entitled to any creditable service that accrued after December 1, 2012, regardless of whether that creditable service was earned by virtue of membership in the System, accrued by conversion of sick leave at the point of the member’s retirement, accrued by transfer of service from another retirement system, purchased by the member in accordance with this Article, or accrued by any other means. For purposes of this subsection, creditable service attributable to the conversion of sick leave accrues in this System on the date of retirement, service transferred to this System from another system accrues in this System on the effective date of the transfer, and purchased service accrues in this System on the date of the purchase.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 187, 190; 1989, c. 762, s. 1; 1993, c. 321, s. 71; 2007-179, s. 1(b); 2009-281, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 89; 2012-193, s. 8; 2020-48, s. 4.4(g), (h).

§ 120-4.12A.
Reciprocity of creditable service with other state-administered retirement systems.

Only for the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits accruing under this Article, creditable service standing to the credit of a member of the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System shall be added to the creditable service standing to the credit of a member of this System; provided, that in the event a person is a retired member of any of the foregoing retirement systems, such creditable service standing to the credit of the retired member prior to retirement shall be likewise counted. In no instance shall service credits maintained in the aforementioned retirement systems be added to the creditable service in this System for application of this System’s benefit accrual rate in computing a service retirement benefit unless specifically authorized by this Article.

A person who was a former member of this System and who has forfeited his creditable service in this System by receiving a return of contributions and who has creditable service in the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System may count such creditable service for the purpose of restoring the creditable service forfeited in this System under the terms and conditions as set forth in this Article and reestablish membership in this System.

Creditable service under this section shall not be counted twice for the same period of time whether earned as a member, purchased, or granted as prior service credits.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 35(a).

§ 120-4.13.
Transfer of membership and benefits.

The Board of Trustees shall set up procedures to transfer membership from the Legislative Retirement Fund to the Retirement System and to recompute benefits paid to retirees of the Legislative Retirement Fund who elect to transfer to the Retirement System.

The accumulated contributions and creditable service of any member whose service as a member of the General Assembly has been or is terminated other than by retirement or death and who, while still a member of this Retirement System, became or becomes a member, as defined in

G.S. 135-1(13)

, of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System for a period of five or more years may, upon application of the member, be transferred from this Retirement System to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System. In order to effect the transfer of a member’s creditable service from the Legislative Retirement System to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, there shall be transferred from the Legislative Retirement System to the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System the sum of (i) the accumulated contributions of the member credited in the annuity savings fund and (ii) the amount of reserve held in the Legislative Retirement System as a result of previous contributions by the employer on behalf of the transferring member.

The accumulated contributions and creditable service of any member whose service as a member of the General Assembly has been or is terminated other than by retirement or death and who, while still a member of this Retirement System, became or becomes a member, as defined in

G.S. 135-53(11)

, of the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System for a period of five or more years may, upon application of the member, be transferred from this Retirement System to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System. In order to effect the transfer of a member’s creditable service from the Legislative Retirement System to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, there shall be transferred from the Legislative Retirement System to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System the sum of (i) the accumulated contributions of the member credited in the annuity savings fund and (ii) the amount of reserve held in the Legislative Retirement System as a result of previous contributions by the employer on behalf of the transferring member.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 2003-284, s. 30.18(a).

§ 120-4.14.
Purchase of prior service.

Purchase of prior service rendered by a member of the General Assembly before becoming a member of the Retirement System that is not service that may be transferred pursuant to

G.S. 120-4.12

shall be at the rate of one month of service for each month for which a legislator received compensation, computed as follows:

For final legislative terms beginning with the 1975 General Assembly, seven percent (7%) of the highest legislative compensation at the time of purchase plus an administrative fee to be paid in lump sum.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-85, s. 5, effective June 25, 2018.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; c. 923, s. 217; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 191; 1985, c. 400, s. 2; 2018-85, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

The 2018 amendment, effective June 25, 2018, deleted former subdivision (2), which read:
“For final legislative terms beginning prior to the 1975 General Assembly, five percent (5%) of the highest legislative compensation at the time of purchase plus an administrative fee to be paid in lump sum.”

§ 120-4.15.
Repayment of contributions.

On or before December 31, 2021, repayment of contributions withdrawn from the Legislative Retirement Fund and System shall be at the rate of seven percent (7%) of the highest monthly compensation received as a legislator at the time of purchase for each month of creditable service restored plus an administrative fee to be paid in lump sum.

On and after January 1, 2022, repayment of contributions withdrawn from the Legislative Retirement Fund and System shall be in an amount equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; c. 923, s. 217; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 192; 2020-29, s. 1(f).

§ 120-4.16.
Repayments and purchases.

All repayments and purchases of service credit, allowed under this Article, shall be made within two years after the member first becomes eligible to make such repayments and purchases. All such repayments and purchases not made within two years after the member becomes eligible shall equal the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System upon the advice of the consulting actuary. The calculation of the amount payable shall also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

Purchase of Service Credits Through Rollover Contributions From Certain Other Plans. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and without regard to any limitations on contributions otherwise set forth in this Article, a member, who is eligible to restore or purchase membership or creditable service pursuant to the provisions of this Article, may purchase such service credits through rollover contributions to the Annuity Savings Fund from (i) an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code which is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state, (iii) an individual retirement account or annuity described in Section 408(a) or 408(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that is eligible to be rolled over and would otherwise be includible in gross income, or (iv) a qualified plan described in Section 401(a) or 403(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Retirement System shall not accept any amount as a rollover contribution unless such amount is eligible to be rolled over to a qualified trust in accordance with applicable law and the member provides evidence satisfactory to the Retirement System that such amount qualifies for rollover treatment. Unless received by the Retirement System in the form of a direct rollover, the rollover contribution must be paid to the Retirement System on or before the 60th day after the date it was received by the member.

(b1)

Purchase of Service Credits Through Plan-to-Plan Transfers. —

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and without regard to any limitations on contributions otherwise set forth in this Article, a member, who is eligible to restore or purchase membership or creditable service pursuant to the provisions of this Article, may purchase such service credits through a direct transfer to the Annuity Savings Fund of funds from (i) an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code or (ii) an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Code which is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state.

Purchase of Service Credits Through Plan-to-Plan Transfers. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and without regard to any limitations on contributions otherwise set forth in this Article, a member, who is eligible to restore or purchase membership or creditable service pursuant to the provisions of this Article, may purchase such service credits through a direct transfer to the Annuity Savings Fund of funds from (i) the Supplemental Retirement Income Plans A, B, or C of North Carolina or (ii) any other defined contribution plan qualified under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code which is maintained by the State of North Carolina, a political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1987, c. 738, s. 31(b); 2002-71, s. 1; 2017-102, s. 18; 2020-29, s. 1(g).

§ 120-4.17.
Assets of retirement system.

All of the assets of the Retirement System shall be credited according to the purpose for which they are held to one of two funds, either the Annuity Savings Fund or the Pension Accumulation Fund.

The Annuity Savings Fund is the fund to which all members’ contributions, and regular interest allowances provided for as in G.S. 135-7(b), shall be credited. From this fund shall be paid the accumulated contributions of a member.

Upon the retirement of a member, his accumulated contributions shall be transferred from the Annuity Savings Fund to the Pension Accumulation Fund. In the event that a retired former member should subsequently again become a member of the Retirement System as provided for in

G.S. 120-4.11

, any excess of his accumulated contributions at his date of retirement over the sum of the retirement allowance payments received by him since his date of retirement shall be transferred from the Pension Accumulation Fund to the Annuity Savings Fund and shall be credited to his individual account in the Annuity Savings Fund.

The Pension Accumulation Fund is the fund in which accumulated contributions by the State and amounts transferred from the Annuity Savings Fund in accordance with subsection (c) of this section and to which all income from the invested assets of the Retirement System are credited. From this fund is paid retirement allowances and any other benefits provided for under this Article except payments of accumulated contributions as provided in

G.S. 120-4.14

.

The regular interest allowance on the members’ accumulated contributions provided for as in G.S. 135-7(b) shall be transferred each year from the Pension Accumulation Fund to the Annuity Savings Fund.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238.

§ 120-4.18.
Management of funds.

The Board of Trustees shall manage the fund established by

G.S. 120-4.17

pursuant to

G.S. 135-7

.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238.

§ 120-4.19.
Contributions by the members.

Effective upon convening of the 1985 Regular Session of the General Assembly, each member shall contribute by payroll deduction for each pay period for which he receives compensation seven percent (7%) of his compensation for the period.

Anything within this Article to the contrary notwithstanding, the State, pursuant to the provisions of Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 as amended, shall pick up and pay the contributions which would be payable by the members under this section with respect to the services of such members rendered after the effective date of this paragraph. The members’ contributions picked up by the State shall be designated for all purposes of the Retirement System as member contributions, except for the determination of tax upon a distribution from the System. These contributions shall be credited to the Annuity Savings Fund and accumulated within the Fund in a member’s account which shall be separately established for the purpose of accounting for picked-up contributions. Member contributions picked up by the State shall be payable from the same source of funds used for the payment of compensation to a member. A deduction shall be made from a member’s compensation equal to the amount of his contributions picked up by the State. This deduction, however, shall not reduce a member’s compensation as defined in

G.S. 120-4.8(1)

. Picked-up contributions shall be transmitted to the Retirement System monthly for the preceding month by means of a warrant drawn by the State payable to the Retirement System and shall be accompanied by a schedule of the picked-up contributions on such forms as may be prescribed.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1985, c. 400, s. 8.

§ 120-4.20.
Contributions by the State.

Effective upon convening of the 1985 Regular Session of the General Assembly, the State shall contribute annually an amount equal to the sum of the “normal contribution” and the “accrued liability contribution.”

The normal contribution for any period shall be determined as a percentage, equal to the normal contribution rate, of the total compensation of the members for the period. The normal contribution rate shall be determined as the percentage represented by the ratio of (i) the annual normal cost to provide the benefits of the Retirement System, computed in accordance with recognized actuarial principles on the basis of methods and assumptions approved by the Board of Trustees, in excess of the part thereof provided by the members’ contributions, to (ii) the total annual compensation of the members of the Retirement System.

The accrued liability contribution for any period shall be determined as a percentage, equal to the accrued liability contribution rate, of the total compensation of the members for the period. The accrued liability contribution rate shall be determined as the percentage represented by the ratio of (i) the level annual contribution necessary to amortize the unfunded accrued liability over a period of 15 years, computed in accordance with recognized actuarial principles on the basis of methods and assumptions approved by the Board of Trustees, to (ii) the total annual compensation of the members of the Retirement System.

The unfunded accrued liability as of any date shall be determined, in accordance with recognized actuarial principles on the basis of methods and assumptions approved by the Board of Trustees, as the excess of (i) the then present value of the benefits to be provided under the Retirement System in the future over (ii) the sum of the assets of the Retirement System then currently on hand in the Annuity Savings Fund and the Pension Accumulation Fund, plus the then present value of the stipulated contributions to be made in the future by the members, plus the then present value of the normal contributions expected to be made in the future by the State.

The normal contribution rate and the accrued liability contribution rate shall be determined after each annual valuation of the Retirement System and shall remain in effect until a new valuation is made.

The annual contributions by the State for any year shall be at least sufficient, when combined with the amount held in the Pension Accumulation Fund at the start of the year, to provide the retirement allowances and other benefits payable out of the fund during the current year.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238.

§ 120-4.21.
Service retirement benefits.

Eligibility; Application. — Any member may retire with full benefits who has reached 65 years of age with five years of creditable service. Any member may retire with reduced benefits who has reached the age of 50 years with 20 years of creditable service or 60 years with five years of creditable service. The member shall make electronic submission or written application to the Board of Trustees to retire on a service retirement allowance on the first day of the particular calendar month he designates. The designated date shall be no less than one day nor more than 120 days from the filing of the application. During this period of notification, a member may separate from service without forfeiting his retirement benefits.

Computation. — Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) of this section before July 1, 1990, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

For a member whose retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday and upon completion of five years of creditable service, four percent (4%) of his “highest annual salary,” multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

For a member whose retirement date occurs on or after his 60th and before his 65th birthday and upon completion of five years of creditable service, computation as in subdivision (1) of this subsection, reduced by one-fourth of one percent (1/4 of 1%) for each month his retirement date precedes his 65th birthday.

(b1)

Computation. —

Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) of this section on or after July 1, 1990, but before February 1, 1995, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)

For a member whose retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday and upon completion of five years of creditable service, four and two-hundredths percent (4.02%) of his “highest annual salary,” multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

(2)

For a member whose retirement date occurs on or after his 60th and before his 65th birthday and upon completion of five years of creditable service, computation as in subdivision (1) of this subsection, reduced by one-fourth of one percent (1/4 of 1%) for each month his retirement date precedes his 65th birthday.

(b2)

Computation. —

Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) of this section on or after February 1, 1995, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

(1)

For a member whose retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday and upon completion of five years of creditable service, four and two-hundredths percent (4.02%) of his “highest annual salary”, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

(2)

For a member whose retirement date occurs on or after his 60th and before his 65th birthday and upon completion of five years of creditable service, computation as in subdivision (1) of this subsection, reduced by one-fourth of one percent (1/4 of 1%) for each month his retirement date precedes his 65th birthday.

For a member whose retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 60th birthday and upon completion of 20 years of creditable service, computation as in subdivision (2) of this subsection, reduced by the same percentage as provided for in Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes.

Limitations Applicable to Members Retiring Before September 1, 2005. — In no event shall any member receive a service retirement allowance greater than seventy-five percent (75%) of his “highest annual salary”.

Limitations Applicable to Members Retiring on or After September 1, 2005. — In no event shall any member receive a service retirement allowance greater than seventy-five percent (75%) of the member’s “highest annual salary” nor shall a member receive any service retirement allowance whatsoever while employed in a position that makes the member a contributing member of either the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System. If the member should become a member of either of these systems, payment of the member’s service retirement allowance shall be suspended until the member withdraws from membership in that system.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.30(p); 2001-424, s. 32.30(b); 2005-276, s. 29.30A(j); 2006-226, ss. 23(a), (b); 2007-431, s. 3; 2009-66, s. 12(k).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-226, s. 23(a), (b), effective August 10, 2006, in the former first version of subsection (c), substituted “Limitations Applicable to Members Retiring Before September 1, 2005” for “Limitations” in the subsection catchline; recodified the former second version of subsection (c) as subsection (d); and in subsection (d), substituted “Limitations Applicable to Members Retiring on or After September 1, 2005” for “Limitations” in the subsection catchline.

Session Laws 2007-431, s. 3, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “120 days” for “90 days” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 12(k), effective July 1, 2009, inserted “electronic submission or” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

§ 120-4.22.
Disability retirement benefits.

Eligibility; Application. — Upon application by or on behalf of the member, any member in service who has completed at least five years of creditable service and who has not reached his 60th birthday may, after medical certification, be retired on a disability retirement allowance by the Board of Trustees on the first day of the particular calendar month designated by the applicant. The designated date shall be no less than one day nor more than 120 days from the filing of the application.

Medical Certification. — After a medical examination of the member, the medical board shall certify to the Board of Trustees that the member is mentally or physically incapacitated for further performance of duty as a member of the General Assembly, that the incapacity was incurred at the time of active employment and has been continuous thereafter, that the incapacity is likely to be permanent and whether the member should be retired.

Computation. — Upon retirement for disability pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, a member shall receive a disability retirement allowance equal to a service retirement allowance calculated on the basis of the member’s “highest annual salary” and the creditable service he would have had by the age of 60 had he continued in service.

Limitations. — In no event shall any member receive a disability retirement allowance greater than seventy-five percent (75%) of his “highest annual salary”.

History.

1983, c. 761, s. 238; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 195, 196; 1987, c. 513, s. 1; c. 738, s. 31(d); 2001-424, s. 32.30(c); 2009-66, s. 3(l).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-66, s. 3(
l
), effective July 1, 2009, substituted “120 days” for “90 days” in the last sentence of subsection (a).